Virginia statutes. Title 16.1. Courts Not of Record.
Article 9. Disposition.
§ 16.1-283.
Termination of residual parental rights.

The residual parental rights of a parent or parents may be terminated by the court as hereinafter provided in a separate proceeding if the petition specifically requests such relief. No petition seeking termination of residual parental rights shall be accepted by the court prior to the filing of a foster care plan, pursuant to §

16.1-281

, which documents termination of residual parental rights as being in the best interests of the child. The court may hear and adjudicate a petition for termination of parental rights in the same proceeding in which the court has approved a foster care plan which documents that termination is in the best interests of the child. The court may terminate the residual parental rights of one parent without affecting the rights of the other parent. The local board of social services or a licensed child-placing agency need not have identified an available and eligible family to adopt a child for whom termination of parental rights is being sought prior to the entry of an order terminating parental rights.Any order terminating residual parental rights shall be accompanied by an order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency or transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest. However, in such cases the court shall give a consideration to granting custody to a person with a legitimate interest, and if custody is not granted to a person with a legitimate interest, the judge shall communicate to the parties the basis for such decision either orally or in writing. An order continuing or granting custody to a local board of social services or to a licensed child-placing agency shall indicate whether that board or agency shall have the authority to place the child for adoption and consent thereto.The summons shall be served upon the parent or parents and the other parties specified in §

16.1-263

. Written notice of the hearing shall also be provided to the foster parents of the child, a relative providing care for the child, and any preadoptive parents for the child informing them that they may appear as witnesses at the hearing to give testimony and otherwise participate in the proceeding. The persons entitled to notice and an opportunity to be heard need not be made parties to the proceedings. The summons or notice of hearing shall clearly state the consequences of a termination of residual parental rights. Service shall be made pursuant to §

16.1-264

.

The residual parental rights of a parent or parents of a child found by the court to be neglected or abused and placed in foster care as a result of (i) court commitment; (ii) an entrustment agreement entered into by the parent or parents; or (iii) other voluntary relinquishment by the parent or parents may be terminated if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that:

The neglect or abuse suffered by such child presented a serious and substantial threat to his life, health or development; and

It is not reasonably likely that the conditions which resulted in such neglect or abuse can be substantially corrected or eliminated so as to allow the child’s safe return to his parent or parents within a reasonable period of time. In making this determination, the court shall take into consideration the efforts made to rehabilitate the parent or parents by any public or private social, medical, mental health or other rehabilitative agencies prior to the child’s initial placement in foster care.Proof of any of the following shall constitute prima facie evidence of the conditions set forth in subdivision B 2:

The parent or parents have a mental or emotional illness or intellectual disability of such severity that there is no reasonable expectation that such parent will be able to undertake responsibility for the care needed by the child in accordance with his age and stage of development;

The parent or parents have habitually abused or are addicted to intoxicating liquors, narcotics or other dangerous drugs to the extent that proper parental ability has been seriously impaired and the parent, without good cause, has not responded to or followed through with recommended and available treatment which could have improved the capacity for adequate parental functioning; or

The parent or parents, without good cause, have not responded to or followed through with appropriate, available and reasonable rehabilitative efforts on the part of social, medical, mental health or other rehabilitative agencies designed to reduce, eliminate or prevent the neglect or abuse of the child.

The residual parental rights of a parent or parents of a child placed in foster care as a result of court commitment, an entrustment agreement entered into by the parent or parents or other voluntary relinquishment by the parent or parents may be terminated if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that:

The parent or parents have, without good cause, failed to maintain continuing contact with and to provide or substantially plan for the future of the child for a period of six months after the child’s placement in foster care notwithstanding the reasonable and appropriate efforts of social, medical, mental health or other rehabilitative agencies to communicate with the parent or parents and to strengthen the parent-child relationship. Proof that the parent or parents have failed without good cause to communicate on a continuing and planned basis with the child for a period of six months shall constitute prima facie evidence of this condition; or

The parent or parents, without good cause, have been unwilling or unable within a reasonable period of time not to exceed 12 months from the date the child was placed in foster care to remedy substantially the conditions which led to or required continuation of the child’s foster care placement, notwithstanding the reasonable and appropriate efforts of social, medical, mental health or other rehabilitative agencies to such end. Proof that the parent or parents, without good cause, have failed or been unable to make substantial progress towards elimination of the conditions which led to or required continuation of the child’s foster care placement in accordance with their obligations under and within the time limits or goals set forth in a foster care plan filed with the court or any other plan jointly designed and agreed to by the parent or parents and a public or private social, medical, mental health or other rehabilitative agency shall constitute prima facie evidence of this condition. The court shall take into consideration the prior efforts of such agencies to rehabilitate the parent or parents prior to the placement of the child in foster care.

The residual parental rights of a parent or parents of a child found by the court to be neglected or abused upon the ground of abandonment may be terminated if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that:

The child was abandoned under such circumstances that either the identity or the whereabouts of the parent or parents cannot be determined; and

The child’s parent or parents, guardian, or relatives have not come forward to identify such child and claim a relationship to the child within three months following the issuance of an order by the court placing the child in foster care; and

Diligent efforts have been made to locate the child’s parent or parents, guardian, or relatives without avail.

The residual parental rights of a parent or parents of a child who is in the custody of a local board or licensed child-placing agency may be terminated by the court if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that (i) the residual parental rights of the parent regarding a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated; (ii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes murder or voluntary manslaughter, or a felony attempt, conspiracy or solicitation to commit any such offense, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent, a child with whom the parent resided at the time such offense occurred or the other parent of the child; (iii) the parent has been convicted of an offense under the laws of the Commonwealth or a substantially similar law of any other state, the United States or any foreign jurisdiction that constitutes felony assault resulting in serious bodily injury or felony bodily wounding resulting in serious bodily injury or felony sexual assault, if the victim of the offense was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time of such offense; or (iv) the parent has subjected any child to aggravated circumstances.As used in this section:“Aggravated circumstances” means torture, chronic or severe abuse, or chronic or severe sexual abuse, if the victim of such conduct was a child of the parent or a child with whom the parent resided at the time such conduct occurred, including the failure to protect such a child from such conduct, which conduct or failure to protect: (i) evinces a wanton or depraved indifference to human life, or (ii) has resulted in the death of such a child or in serious bodily injury to such a child.“Chronic abuse” or “chronic sexual abuse” means recurring acts of physical abuse which place the child’s health, safety and well-being at risk.“Serious bodily injury” means bodily injury that involves substantial risk of death, extreme physical pain, protracted and obvious disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of a bodily member, organ or mental faculty.“Severe abuse” or “severe sexual abuse” may include an act or omission that occurred only once, but otherwise meets the definition of “aggravated circumstances.” The local board or other child welfare agency having custody of the child shall not be required by the court to make reasonable efforts to reunite the child with a parent who has been convicted of one of the felonies specified in this subsection or who has been found by the court to have subjected any child to aggravated circumstances.

The local board or licensed child-placing agency to which authority is given to place the child for adoption and consent thereto after an order terminating parental rights is entered shall file a written Adoption Progress Report with the juvenile court on the progress being made to place the child in an adoptive home. The report shall be filed with the court every six months from the date of the final order terminating parental rights until a final order of adoption is entered on behalf of the child in the circuit court. At the conclusion of the hearing at which termination of parental rights is ordered and authority is given to the local board or licensed child-placing agency to place the child for adoption, the juvenile court shall schedule a date by which the board or agency shall file the first written Adoption Progress Report required by this section. A copy of the Adoption Progress Report shall be sent by the court to the guardian ad litem for the child. The court may schedule a hearing on the report with or without the request of a party.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, residual parental rights shall not be terminated if it is established that the child, if he is 14 years of age or older or otherwise of an age of discretion as determined by the court, objects to such termination. However, residual parental rights of a child 14 years of age or older may be terminated over the objection of the child, if the court finds that any disability of the child reduces the child’s developmental age and that the child is not otherwise of an age of discretion.

A1.

Any order transferring custody of the child to a person with a legitimate interest pursuant to subsection A shall be entered only upon a finding, based upon a preponderance of the evidence, that such person is one who, after an investigation as directed by the court, (i) is found by the court to be willing and qualified to receive and care for the child; (ii) is willing to have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) is committed to providing a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) is willing and has the ability to protect the child from abuse and neglect; and the order shall so state. The court’s order transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest should further provide, as appropriate, for any terms and conditions that would promote the child’s interest and welfare.

History.

1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 340; 1979, c. 281; 1980, c. 295; 1985, c. 584; 1987, c. 6; 1988, c. 791; 1998, c. 550; 1999, c. 889; 2000, c. 385; 2002, cc. 664, 729; 2012, cc. 476, 507; 2019, c. 434; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 535.

Cross references.

As to testimony of child by use of two-way closed-circuit television in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1521

. As to admission of out-of-court statements made by certain children in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1522

. As to use of videotaped statements of certain children who are complaining witnesses in civil proceedings involving alleged abuse or neglect of a child, see §

63.2-1523

.

As to meaning of child and related terms, see §

64.2-102

.

The 1998 amendment

rewrote this section.

The 1999 amendment,

in subsection A, deleted “public welfare or” following “local board of,” and substituted “child-placing” for “care placing,” and in the second paragraph deleted “public welfare or” following “local board of” in two places; inserted “of time” in subdivision C 2; deleted former subsection F, which read: “The residual parental rights of a parent or parents of a child may be terminated by the court if the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that it is in the best interests of the child and that the residual parental rights of the parent to a sibling of the child have previously been involuntarily terminated;” redesignated former subsection G as present subsection F, inserted “Adoption Progress,” and inserted “in the circuit court. At the conclusion of the hearing at which termination of parental rights is ordered and authority is given to the local board or licensed child-placing agency to place the child for adoption, the juvenile court shall schedule a date by which the board or agency shall file the first written Adoption Progress Report required by this section. A copy of the Adoption Progress Report shall be sent by the court to the guardian ad litem for the child” in said subsection; and redesignated former subsection H as present subsection G.

The 2000 amendments.

The 2000 amendment by c. 385 added “subject to the provisions of subsection A1 of this section” at the end of the first sentence of the second paragraph of subsection A; added subsection A1; and added the last sentence of subsection G.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendments by cc. 664 and 729 are identical, and in subsection E, substituted “that” for “which” following “jurisdiction” in clauses (ii) and (iii), deleted “or” preceding clause (iii), added clause (iv), added definitions for “aggravated circumstances,” “chronic abuse,” and “severe abuse,” and added “or who has been found by the court to have subjected any child to aggravated circumstances” at the end of the last paragraph.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 476 and 507 are identical, and substituted “The parent or parents have a mental or emotional illness or intellectual disability” for “The parent or parents are suffering from a mental or emotional illness or mental deficiency” in subdivision B 2 a; and made minor stylistic changes throughout the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 434, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relative or other interested individual” throughout; in the second paragraph of subsection A, substituted “person with a legitimate interest” for “relatives of the child, including grandparents”; in subsection A1, substituted “such person” for “the relative or other interested individual”; and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 535, effective July 1, 2021, in subsection A in the second paragraph, substituted “or transferring custody to a person with a legitimate interest” for “or granting custody or guardianship to a person with a legitimate interest, subject to the provisions of subsection A1,” and added “and if custody is not granted to a person with a legitimate interest, the judge shall communicate to the parties the basis for such decision either orally or in writing; and made a stylistic change.

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on domestic relations for the year 1976-1977, see 63 Va. L. Rev. 1418 (1977).

For comment on termination of parental rights, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 213 (1980).

For overview of Virginia Supreme Court decisions on domestic relations, see 15 U. Rich. L. Rev. 321 (1981).

For survey of developments in Virginia domestic relations law for year 1979-1980, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 351 (1981).

For article on termination of indigents’ parental rights, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 731 (1982).

For comment on Doe v. Doe,

222 Va. 736

, 284 S.E.2d 799 (1981) as to fitness of homosexuals as parents, see 16 U. Rich. L. Rev. 851 (1982).

For essay, see “Terminating Parental Rights through a Backdoor in the Virginia Code: Adoptions Under section

63.2-1202

(H),” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 371 (2013).

For essay, “Virginia Ranks Forty-Ninth of Fifty: The Need for Stronger Laws Supporting Foster Youth,” see 53 U. Rich. L. Rev. 255 (2018).

For comment, “ ‘In the Little World’: Breaking Virginia’s Foster-Care-to-Prison Pipeline Using Restorative Justice,” see 54 U. Rich. L. Rev. 313 (2019).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

5B M.J. Criminal Procedure, § 2; 6A M.J. Divorce and Alimony, § 53.1; 14A M.J. Parent and Child, §§ 4, 7, 11.

§ 16.1-283.1.
Authority to enter into voluntary post-adoption contact and communication agreement.

In any case in which (i) a child has been placed in foster care as a result of (a) court commitment, (b) an entrustment agreement entered into by the parent or parents, or (c) other voluntary relinquishment by the parent or parents; (ii) the parent or parents have voluntarily consented to the adoption of the child; or (iii) the parental rights of the parent or parents have been involuntarily terminated, the child’s birth parent or parents may enter into a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement with the pre-adoptive parent or parents as provided in Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2. Unless the parental rights of the birth parent or parents have been terminated pursuant to subsection E of §

16.1-283

, a local board of social services or child welfare agency required to file a petition for a permanency planning hearing pursuant to §

16.1-282.1

may inform the birth parent or parents and shall inform the adoptive parent or parents that they may enter into such an agreement and shall inform the child if he is 14 years of age or older that he may consent to such an agreement.

The court may consider the appropriateness of a written post-adoption contact and communication agreement entered into pursuant to subsection A and in accordance with Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2 at the permanency planning hearing pursuant to §

16.1-282.1

and, if the court finds that all of the requirements of subsection A and Article 1.1 (§

63.2-1220.2

et seq.) of Chapter 12 of Title 63.2 have been met, shall incorporate the written post-adoption contact and communication agreement into an order entered at the conclusion of such hearing.

History.

2009, cc. 98, 260; 2010, c. 331; 2019, cc. 65, 84; 2020, c. 98.

The 2010 amendments.

The 2010 amendment by c. 331 rewrote the section.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 65 and 84 are identical, and in subsection A, inserted “(i),” “(ii),” “(iii)” and “any case in” in the first sentence and added the second sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 98, in subsection A, inserted the clause (i) and (ii) designations and redesignated former clauses (i) through (iii) as clauses (a) through (c), deleted “or in any case in which” at the end of clause (ii) and inserted “(iii) the parental rights of the parent or parents have been involuntarily terminated.”

§ 16.1-283.2.
Restoration of parental rights.

If a child is in the custody of the local department of social services and a pre-adoptive parent or parents have not been identified and approved for the child, the child’s guardian ad litem or the local board of social services may file a petition to restore the previously terminated parental rights of the child’s parent under the following circumstances:

The child is at least 14 years of age;

The child was previously adjudicated to be an abused or neglected child, child in need of services, child in need of supervision, or delinquent child;

The parent’s rights were terminated under a final order pursuant to subsection B, C, or D of §

16.1-283

at least two years prior to the filing of the petition to restore parental rights;

The child has not achieved his permanency goal or the permanency goal was achieved but not sustained; and

The child, if he is 14 years of age or older, and the parent whose rights are to be reinstated consent to the restoration of the parental rights.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A, the court may accept (i) a petition involving a child younger than 14 years of age if (a) the child is the sibling of a child for whom a petition for restoration of parental rights has been filed and the child who is younger than 14 years of age meets all other criteria for restoration of parental rights set forth in subsection A, or (b) the child’s guardian ad litem and the local department of social services jointly file the petition for restoration; or (ii) a petition filed before the expiration of the two-year period following termination of parental rights if the child will turn 18 before the expiration of the two-year period, and the court finds that accepting such a petition is in the best interest of the child.

The court shall set a hearing on the petition and serve notice of the hearing along with a copy of the petition on the former parent of the child whose rights are the subject of the petition, any other parent who retains legal rights to the child, the child’s court-appointed special advocate, if one has been appointed, and either the child’s guardian ad litem or the local board of social services, whichever is not the petitioner.

If the court finds, based upon clear and convincing evidence, that the parent is willing and able to (i) receive and care for the child; (ii) have a positive, continuous relationship with the child; (iii) provide a permanent, suitable home for the child; and (iv) protect the child from abuse and neglect, the court may enter an order permitting the local board of social services to place the child with the former parent whose rights are the subject of the petition, subject to the requirements of the placement plan developed pursuant to subsection E and for visitation required pursuant to subsection F.

Within 60 days of the filing of the petition for restoration of parental rights and prior to the entry of an order pursuant to subsection D, the local board of social services shall develop a written placement plan for the child, which shall (i) describe the programs, services, and other supports that shall be offered to the child and the former parent with whom the child has been placed and (ii) set forth requirements for the participation of the former parent with whom the child has been placed in programs and services described in the placement plan and the conduct of the child’s former parent with whom the child has been placed. Such plan shall be incorporated into the order entered pursuant to subsection D.

Following the placement of a child with his former parent following entry of an order pursuant to subsection D, the director of the local department of social services shall cause the child to be visited by an agent of such local board or local department at least three times within the six-month period immediately following placement of the child in order to evaluate the suitability of the placement and the progress of the former parent toward remedying the factors and conditions that led to or required continuation of the child’s foster care placement; however, no less than 90 days shall elapse between the first visit and the last visit. At least one of the visits shall be conducted in the home of the former parent whose rights are the subject of the petition in the presence of the former parent.

Upon completion of the visitation required pursuant to subsection F, the director of the local department of social services shall make a written report to the court, in such form as the Commissioner of Social Services may prescribe, describing (i) findings made as a result of the visits required pursuant to subsection F and (ii) findings and information related to the former parent’s compliance with requirements of the placement plan developed pursuant to subsection E.

Upon receipt of the report required pursuant to subsection G, the court shall set a hearing on the petition for restoration of parental rights and serve notice of the hearing, along with a copy of the report required pursuant to subsection G, on the former parent of the child whose rights are the subject of the petition, any other parent who retains legal rights to the child, the child’s court-appointed special advocate, if one has been appointed, and the child’s guardian ad litem.

If, upon consideration of the report required pursuant to subsection G, the court finds by clear and convincing evidence that the restoration of parental rights is in the child’s best interest, the court shall enter an order restoring the parental rights of the child’s parent. In determining whether restoration is in the best interest of the child, the court shall consider the following:

Whether the parent whose rights are to be reinstated agrees to the reinstatement and has substantially remedied the conditions that led to or required continuation of the child’s foster care placement;

The age and maturity of the child and whether the child consents to the reinstatement of the former parent’s rights, if the child is 14 years of age or older, or the child’s preference with regard to the reinstatement of the former parent’s rights, if the child is younger than 14 years of age;

Whether the restoration of parental rights will present a risk to the child’s life, health, or development;

Whether the restoration of parental rights will affect benefits available to the child; and

Other material changes in circumstances, if any, that warrant the granting of the petition.

The court may revoke its order permitting the placement of a child with his former parent pursuant to subsection D at any time prior to entry of an order restoring parental rights to the former parent of the child, for good cause shown, on its own motion or on the motion of the child’s guardian ad litem or the local department.

A petition for restoration of parental rights filed while the child is younger than 18 years of age shall not become invalid because the child reaches 18 years of age prior to the entry of an order of restoration of parental rights. Any order restoring parental rights to a parent of a child pursuant to this section entered after a child reaches 18 years of age, where the petition was filed prior to the child turning 18 years of age, shall have the same effect as if the child was under 18 years of age at the time the order was entered by the court.

The granting of a petition under this section does not vacate the findings of fact or conclusions of law contained in the original order that terminated the parental rights of the child’s parent.

History.

2013, cc. 338, 685.

Cross references.

As to the Court-Appointed Special Advocate Program, see §

9.1-151

.

Law Review.

For annual survey article, see “Family Law,” 48 U. Rich. L. Rev. 135 (2013).

§ 16.1-283.3.
Review of voluntary continuing services and support agreements for former foster youth.

Whenever a program participant, as defined in §

63.2-918

, enters into a voluntary continuing services and support agreement with a local department of social services pursuant to §

63.2-921

, a hearing shall be held to review the agreement and the program participant’s case plan. In determining whether to approve the case plan, the court shall determine whether remaining in the care and placement responsibility of the local department of social services is in the program participant’s best interests and whether the program participant’s case plan is sufficient to achieve the goal of independence. Such hearing shall be held by the juvenile and domestic relations district court that last had jurisdiction over the program participant’s foster care proceedings when the program participant was a minor. The petition for review of the voluntary continuing services and support agreement and the program participant’s case plan shall be filed by the local department of social services no later than 30 days after execution of the voluntary continuing services and support agreement. The petition shall include documentation of the program participant’s last foster care placement as a minor and the responsible local department of social services, a copy of the signed voluntary continuing services and support agreement, a copy of the program participant’s case plan, and any other information the local department of social services or the program participant wishes the court to consider.

Upon receiving a petition for review of the voluntary continuing services and support agreement and the program participant’s case plan, the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within 45 days after receipt of the petition. The court may appoint counsel or a guardian ad litem for the program participant pursuant to §

16.1-266

. The court may reappoint or continue the appointment of the court-appointed special advocate volunteer who served the program participant as a minor or, if the previous volunteer is unavailable, appoint another special advocate volunteer. The court shall provide notice of the hearing and copies of the petition to the program participant, the program participant’s legal counsel, the local department of social services, and any other persons who, in the court’s discretion, have a legitimate interest in the hearing. The local department of social services shall identify for the court all persons who may have a legitimate interest in the hearing.

At the conclusion of the hearing, the court shall enter an order that:

Determines whether remaining under the care and placement responsibility of the local department of social services is in the best interests of the program participant; and

Approves or denies the program participant’s case plan.In determining whether to approve or deny the program participant’s case plan, the court shall consider whether the services and support provided under the case plan are sufficient to support the program participant’s goal of achieving independence. If the court makes any revision to the case plan, a copy of such revisions shall be sent by the court to all persons who received a copy of the original case plan.

After the initial hearing, the court may close the case or schedule a subsequent hearing to be held within six months to review the program participant’s case plan. Subsequent review hearings may be held at six-month or shorter intervals in the discretion of the court. The local department of social services shall file a petition for review of the program participant’s case plan within 30 days prior to any such scheduled hearing. If a hearing was not previously scheduled, the court shall schedule a hearing to be held within 30 days of receipt of the petition. The court shall provide notice of the hearing and a copy of the petition in accordance with subsection B. If subsequent review hearings are not held by the court, the local department of social services shall conduct administrative reviews pursuant to §

63.2-923

.

In all hearings held pursuant to this section, the court shall consult with the program participant in an age-appropriate manner regarding his case plan.

History.

2020, cc. 95, 732.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2020, cc. 95 and 732, cl. 3 provides: “That the Board of Social Services (the Board) shall promulgate regulations to implement the provisions of this act. The Board’s initial adoption of regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this act shall be exempt from the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq. of the Code of Virginia), except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulations prior to adoption.”

Acts 2020, cc. 95 and 732, cl. 4 provides: “That the Department of Social Services shall analyze the feasibility of and opportunities for allowing local departments of social services to use video conferencing for monthly visits with participants in the Fostering Futures program in a manner that complies with federal laws and regulations.”

§ 16.1-284.
When adult sentenced for juvenile offense.

When the juvenile court sentences an adult who has committed, before attaining the age of 18, an offense that would be a crime if committed by an adult, the court may impose, for each offense, the penalties that are authorized to be imposed on adults for such violations, not to exceed the punishment for a Class 1 misdemeanor, provided that the total jail sentence imposed shall not exceed 36 continuous months and the total fine shall not exceed $2,500 or the court may order a disposition as provided in subdivision A 4, 5, 7, 11, 12, 14, or 17 and subsection B of §

16.1-278.8

.

A person sentenced pursuant to this section shall earn good time credit at the rate of one day for each one day served, including all days served while confined in jail or secured detention prior to conviction and sentencing, in which the person has not violated the written rules and regulations of the jail.

History.

Code 1950, § 16.1-177.1; 1956, c. 555; 1973, c. 440; 1977, c. 559; 1978, c. 142; 1980, c. 235; 1983, c. 336; 1985, c. 260; 1996, cc. 755, 914; 2016, c. 626; 2020, cc. 18, 532.

Cross references.

For exception to confidentiality of proceedings in cases where a child is sentenced as an adult in accordance with this section, see §

16.1-309.1

.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

The 1996 amendments.

The 1996 amendments by cc. 755 and 914 are identical, and rewrote the section, which formerly read: “Until June 30, 1986, if a child fifteen years of age or older is charged with an offense which if committed by an adult would be a felony and the court after receipt of a social history compiled pursuant to §

16.1-273

for this case or a prior case which was adjudicated within twelve months from the adjudication in this case finds that (i) such child is not, in the opinion of the court, amenable to treatment or rehabilitation as a juvenile through available facilities, considering such factors as the nature of the present offense or the nature of the child’s prior delinquency record, the nature of the past treatment efforts and the nature of the child’s response to past treatment efforts and (ii) the interests of the community require that the child be placed under legal restraint or discipline, then the court, in such cases, may impose the penalties which are authorized to be imposed on adults for such violations, not to exceed twelve months in jail for a single offense or multiple offenses and subject to the provisions of §

16.1-249

B (i), (ii) and (iii). After June 30, 1986, such penalties may be imposed only in the case of an adult who has committed, before attaining the age of eighteen, an offense which would be a crime if committed by an adult.”

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 626 rewrote the section, which read: “When the juvenile court sentences an adult who has committed, before attaining the age of eighteen, an offense which would be a crime if committed by an adult, the court may impose the penalties which are authorized to be imposed on adults for such violations, not to exceed the punishment for a Class 1 misdemeanor for a single offense or multiple offenses.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 18 and 532 are identical, and rewrote subsection B, which formerly read: “A person sentenced pursuant to this section shall be entitled to good time credit as authorized by §

53.1-116

.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia statutory changes in substantive criminal law for the year 1970-1971, see 57 Va. L. Rev. 1467 (1971).

For article discussing double jeopardy and waiver of jurisdiction to criminal courts in juvenile proceedings, see 14 Wm. & Mary L. Rev. 266 (1972).

For 1985 survey of Virginia law affecting children, see 19 U. Rich. L. Rev. p. 753 (1985).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

9B M.J. Infants and Juveniles, §§ 13, 84.